src/dictionaries/he_IL.dic
אוששני/e
אחלך/g
איידנה/f
איירה/h
אכזבך/e
אמצם/e
אמרך/g
אנפפה/h
ארובנה/f
ארותן/g
אשפזך/e
אתחלה/h
בדרכם/e
בושך/g
בזבזנה/f
בזרני/e
ביימה/h
ביישכן/e
בלבלך/g
בעטו/h
בעטנה/f
בעלני/e
בקבקכם/g
בשלך/e
גדושנה/f
גדלכן/e
גדשך/g
גוללה/h
גחנכן/g
גלחך/e
גמענה/f
גססנו/h
געותכם/g
גששנה/f
גשתן/g
דהותם/g
דווחה/h
דונך/e
דכדכך/e
דלדלנה/f
דללה/g
דפקו/h
דשדשכם/g
האביסך/e
האדר/f
האנישכם/g
האפירה/h
האצילכן/e
האשמנה/f
הבהירן/e
הביסנו/e
הבליגך/g
הבלענה/f
הבעירנו/e
הבריקני/e
הגבר/f
הגדירכם/e
הגדישו/h
הגיהם/g
הגמישנו/e
הגענה/f
הדבירך/e
הדהדכם/g
הדהירכן/e
הדחנה/f
הדיפו/h
הדליקם/e
הוגיעכם/e
הוחילך/g
הוכחנה/f
הוליככם/e
הוקירכן/e
הושיעכן/e
הזדככה/h
הזדמנכן/g
הזדמרנה/f
הזדקקו/h
הזהיבן/g
הזכירם/e
הזניקם/e
הזנקנה/f
הזריקן/e
החווירך/g
החטאנה/f
החטיאנו/e
החטיפו/h
החליאם/e
החנותכן/e
החניפכן/g
החנק/f
החרישם/e
הטבנה/f
הטותכן/e
הטיפו/h
הטמינן/e
הטרידכן/e
הטריפכם/g
היאורנה/f
היאטמכן/g
היאנסן/g
היבאשם/g
היבחרנה/f
היבחשנו/g
היבצרן/g
היגזמם/g
היגזמנה/f
היגעלכן/g
הידגמם/g
הידלו/f
הידלותן/g
היהגותכן/g
היווספכם/g
היוועדנה/f
היזונם/g
היזרקן/g
היחזותכם/g
היחטפנה/f
היחמצכן/g
היחצבם/g
היחרשן/g
היחשבנה/f
היטבלנו/g
היטפלך/g
היכבי/f
היכזבכן/g
היכספם/g
הילאותכן/g
הילאי/f
הילעסכם/g
הימזגכן/g
הימלאנה/f
הימלככם/g
הינגסן/g
הינגענה/f
הינקעך/g
היסובנה/f
היסכרם/g
היעכרה/g
היעלמנה/f
היעתקכם/g
היפדי/f
היפרטכם/g
היצלה/f
היצפרה/g
היקנו/f
היקנותן/g
הירמסה/g
הירצה/f
הישבען/g
הישלה/f
הישמטך/g
היתוספה/h
היתחבנה/f
היתמכה/g
הכבידם/e
הכילך/e
הכל/f
הכלילכן/e
הכעיסם/e
הכריענו/e
הכרענה/f
הכתירך/e
הלבישנו/e
הלחיננו/e
הלטנה/f
הלינכן/g
הלשינו/h
המחישכם/e
המליכנו/e
המלץ/f
המשיכך/e
הנדנה/f
הנהנה/h
הנחותך/e
הניבך/g
הניסן/e
הנפיקנו/e
הנשם/f
הסגירכם/e
הסיטני/e
הסע/f
הספיגכם/e
הספיקו/h
הסתברכם/g
הסתווגה/h
הסתיימנה/f
הסתלבטה/h
הסתמרכן/g
הסתעפנו/h
העבירכן/e
העדף/f
העטירה/h
העלותך/e
העמיקני/e
העפילכם/g
העפל/f
העצימנו/e
העתיקן/e
הפוכנה/f
הפילם/e
הפליגה/h
הפנותה/e
הפסק/f
הפעימנו/e
הפרידכן/e
הפריסנו/g
הפרישכם/e
הפרס/f
הצדיקך/e
הצהירה/h
הצטברחנה/f
הצטללנו/h
הצטננכן/g
הצטעפנו/h
הצילני/e
הצלף/f
הצמידנו/e
הצניחו/h
הצפינן/e
הקא/f
הקהותכן/e
הקיזכן/e
הקליטכם/e
הקליקכם/g
הקסם/f
הקצותכן/e
הקריבכם/e
הקשבנה/f
הקשיבו/h
הקשיחנו/e
הרגילנו/e
הרוויחנו/e
הרזי/f
הרטיטכן/e
הרכיבכם/e
הרעילכן/e
הרצותה/g
הרק/f
הרקידנו/e
השאילם/e
השבר/f
השהותו/e
השחימם/e
השיגכן/e
השיחה/h
השכיבכן/e
השכירכם/e
השכמנה/f
השמיטך/e
השפרץ/f
השקיטך/e
השתבשכם/g
השתדכה/h
השתהינה/f
השתחלנו/h
השתכנענו/h
השתכפלכן/g
השתלמנה/f
השתמטו/h
השתפלה/h
השתקללן/g
השתרכה/h
השתררנה/f
התאגדה/h
התאזרחן/g
התאיידו/h
התאסלמנה/f
התאפסה/h
התארסכם/g
התבאסה/h
התבוססה/h
התבייתנה/f
התבלטו/h
התבסמם/g
התבררנו/h
התגוששה/h
התגלגלן/g
התגלי/f
התגנבנו/h
התהדקה/h
התוודעך/g
התוודענה/f
התווסתי/h
התוותכם/e
התחוררו/h
התחממנה/f
התחמקו/h
התחמשם/g
התחצפה/h
התחשקו/h
התחתננו/g
התייחמו/h
התייחסנה/f
התייפייפו/h
התיישנכם/g
התכדרנו/h
התכנינה/f
התכפרו/h
התלבנכם/g
התלהמו/h
התלקחו/h
התמד/f
התמוללן/g
התמזלו/h
התמסטלו/h
התמצקנה/f
התמרדם/g
התמרחה/h
התנגשו/h
התנופפו/h
התנותך/g
התנזרנה/f
התנסחה/h
התנקזנו/h
התנשפכן/g
התנשקנה/f
התעדכנו/h
התעכבנו/h
התעמקך/g
התעמרו/h
התענגנה/f
התעקלו/h
התעשתה/h
התפגלך/g
התפזמנו/h
התפחמנה/f
התפילני/e
התפלחו/h
התפנקם/g
התפעמה/h
התפקששנה/f
התפרסנו/h
התקבלו/h
התקבצכן/g
התקילה/h
התקלקלנה/f
התקפלו/h
התקרזלם/g
התקשחה/h
התרגשנה/f
התרווחה/h
התרותך/g
התרחשו/h
התרפאנו/h
התרפקנה/f
וודאי/g
זום/f
זלגה/h
זרענה/f
חבבכם/e
חגרנו/h
חדלן/g
חטופנה/f
חלחלו/h
חמשך/e
חנוקנה/f
חפנך/g
חפפה/h
חרופנה/f
חרתם/h
חתלנו/e
טופפנה/f
טחנן/g
טרחנו/h
יבאו/f
ייבבו/h
ייבבכם/g
ייבשם/e
ייעדה/h
יירקי/f
יישמך/e
ינקך/g
יצגו/f
יצקו/h
כיילנה/f
כססו/h
כפותם/e
כפפן/g
כרכרנה/f
לחלחה/h
לחששנה/f
לכלככן/e
מאננו/g
מזמזנה/f
מחלו/h
ממשכם/e
מספרנה/f
מצמצכן/g
מרחני/e
מתחנה/f
נאפנו/h
נדמם/h
נוחך/g
נומנה/f
נטשכן/e
נכחה/h
נסינה/f
נקותכם/e
נקזנה/f
נקמו/h
נקפם/g
סגננה/h
סדוקנה/f
סיימכן/e
סמאה/g
סמורנה/f
סמרה/h
סקלני/e
סרחנה/f
סררה/h
עופפכן/g
עטרנה/f
עלזה/h
עמלננו/e
עקובנה/f
עקצצך/g
ערטלו/h
ערמכם/e
פדי/f
פחתם/h
פייחכן/g
פייסם/e
פלושנה/f
פנטזה/h
פצענה/f
פקטרם/g
פקססנו/h
פרעני/e
פשי/f
צברחה/h
צדדנו/g
צוקנה/f
צייתה/h
צמררני/e
צפצפנה/f
צקתו/g
צרמנו/h
קחו/f
קטלגכם/e
קמלו/h
קמרן/g
קרעני/e
קרקשו/h
קשקשנה/f
רבותנו/g
רססכם/e
רפרפה/h
רפרפכן/g
רצוצנה/f
רתעו/h
שבצני/e
שהקכם/g
שחברה/h
שחזרנה/f
שחררכן/e
שלקני/e
שנוררה/h
שנסכם/g
שעינה/f
שפדכן/e
שררך/g
תארכי/h
תבלם/e
תיירנה/f
תמהן/g
תמררנו/h
תסכלם/e
תרצן/g
תשאלה/h
